Massachusetts, session 194th, H4091.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 132B of the general laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the city of Salem may by ordinance prohibit the application of second
generation anti-coagulant rodenticides within the City of Salem, including application of such
pesticides by licensed commercial applicators as defined in 333 C.M.R 10.00.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1